District of Columbia statutes.
8-1775.01

Renewable energy study.

Within one year after October 22, 2008, the Mayor shall commission a study to determine the economic, legal, and technical viability of the District government pursuing a new large-scale wind energy project through public financing or private financing.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 601, 55 DCR 9225
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 601 of Clean and Affordable Energy Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-508, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10856).
Section 602 of D.C. Law 17-250 provided: “This title shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”